Montana, session 2025, HB448.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Jim Loud Thunder Gopher memorial highway. (1) There is established the Jim Loud
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 448
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 448
Thunder Gopher memorial highway on the existing northwest bypass and Vaughn road in Great Falls from 14th
street northwest to 27th street northwest.
(2) The department shall design and install appropriate signs marking the location of the Jim Loud
Thunder Gopher memorial highway.
(3) Maps that identify roadways in the state must be updated to include the location of the Jim
Loud Thunder Gopher memorial highway when the department updates and publishes the state maps.
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
60, chapter 1, part 2, and the provisions of Title 60, chapter 1, part 2, apply to [section 1].
Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 448
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 448, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 448
INTRODUCED BY J. WEBER, M. NIKOLAKAKOS, T. CROWE, S. FYANT, J. SOOKTIS, E. TILLEMAN, E.
BUTTREY, M. DUNWELL, W. MCKAMEY, T. RUNNING WOLF, F. SMITH, S. WEBBER, J. WINDY BOY, S.
FITZPATRICK, R. MINER, D. HAWK, C. KEOGH, G. NIKOLAKAKOS, J. TREBAS
AN ACT ESTABLISHING THE JIM LOUD THUNDER GOPHER MEMORIAL HIGHWAY IN CASCADE COUNTY;
DIRECTING THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION TO INSTALL SIGNS AND TO INCLUDE THE
MEMORIAL HIGHWAY ON THE NEXT PUBLICATION OF THE STATE MAP; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE
EFFECTIVE DATE.